Utah statutes.
63J-5-205.   Federal funds awards that exceed approved appropriations.

Each agency that receives federal funds greater than the amount approved through the process provided for in this chapter may, using those excess funds, expend up to 25% in excess of the of the amount approved if:

(1)  receipt or use of the excess federal funds will not require the addition of one or more permanent full-time employees or permanent part-time employees;

(2)  no new state money will be required to match the excess federal funds; and

(3)  receipt or use of the excess federal funds will not require the state to comply with new requirements or conditions in order to receive the federal funds or to participate in the federal program.



Enacted by Chapter 326, 2011 General Session

